Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-409 Acceptance of draft; certified
check. (a) "Acceptance" means the drawee's signed agreement to
pay a draft as presented. It must be written on the draft and may consist of
the drawee's signature alone. Acceptance may be made at any time and becomes
effective when notification pursuant to instructions is given or the accepted
draft is delivered for the purpose of giving rights on the acceptance to any
person.

(b) A draft may be accepted although it has
not been signed by the drawer, is otherwise incomplete, is overdue, or has been
dishonored.

(c) If a draft is payable at a fixed period
after sight and the acceptor fails to date the acceptance, the holder may
complete the acceptance by supplying a date in good faith.

(d) "Certified check" means a check
accepted by the bank on which it is drawn. Acceptance may be made as stated in
subsection (a) or by a writing on the check which indicates that the check is
certified. The drawee of a check has no obligation to certify the check, and
refusal to certify is not dishonor of the check. [L 1991, c 118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next